Washington statutes.
RCW 38.08.060

Governor's decision final.

Whenever any portion of the militia is ordered to duty by the governor, the decision of the governor shall be final, incontrovertible, and unimpeachable.

Whenever any portion of the militia has been ordered out by the governor, it shall be deemed that local law and order and the enforcement thereof has failed, and that the militia shall become an additional police power, retaining its separate entity and operating at all times as a military organization under military command, to cooperate with existing peace forces wherever possible, for the reestablishment of law and order and for the protection of life and property.

[ 1943 c 130 s 7; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-7.]